Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-646
Birth defects; registry; purpose; information released.

The department shall establish a birth defects registry for the purpose of initiating and conducting investigations of the causes, mortality, methods of prevention, treatment, and cure of birth defects and allied diseases. Any information released from the registry shall be disclosed as Class I, Class II, Class III, or Class IV data as provided in sections 81-663 to 81-675.

Laws 1972, LB 1203, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 64;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 547;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 445.